Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1355
Public policy; equal employment opportunity.

It is declared to be in the best interest of the State of Nebraska to insure that historic and any present patterns of sex and racial discrimination are eliminated and that each agency pursue a course of action in all areas of its operation to insure that all citizens are provided with fair and equal opportunities for employment and advancement regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, or physical or mental disability.

Affirmative action shall be taken to insure the implementation of a policy in state government employment which provides equal employment opportunity. Such policy shall apply to:

(1) Hiring, placement, upgrading, transfer, or demotion of employees;

(2) Recruitment, advertising, or solicitation for employment;

(3) Treatment during employment;

(4) Rates of pay or other forms of compensation;

(5) Selection for training;

(6) Layoff, termination, or reinstatement; and

(7) Any other terms or conditions of employment.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 17.